test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_kappeer_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kappeer: # 1B
    kappeer+N+Sg+Nom: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Gen: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Acc: kappeer 
    kappeer+N+Sg+Ill: kaperân
    kappeer+N+Sg+Loc: kaperist 
    kappeer+N+Sg+Com: kaperáin
    kappeer+N+Ess: kaperin 
    kappeer+N+Par: kaperid
    kappeer+N+Pl+Nom: kapereh
    kappeer+N+Pl+Gen: kaperij
    kappeer+N+Pl+Acc: kaperijd
    kappeer+N+Pl+Ill: kaperáid
    kappeer+N+Pl+Loc: kaperijn
    kappeer+N+Pl+Com: kaperijguin
    kappeer+N+Pl+Abe: kaperijttáá 

  Noun - aarrân: # 1B v-g, VVCC > VC, C > C1
    aarrân+N+Sg+Nom: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Gen: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Acc: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Ill: aṛânân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Loc: aṛânist
    aarrân+N+Sg+Com: aṛânáin
    aarrân+N+Sg+Abe: aarrânttáá
    aarrân+N+Ess: aṛânin
    aarrân+N+Par: aṛânid
    aarrân+N+Pl+Nom: aṛâneh
    aarrân+N+Pl+Gen: aṛânij
    aarrân+N+Pl+Acc: aṛânijd
    aarrân+N+Pl+Ill: aṛânáid
    aarrân+N+Pl+Loc: aṛânijn
    aarrân+N+Pl+Com: aṛânijguin
    aarrân+N+Pl+Abe: aṛânijttáá



  Noun - čäällim: # 1B v-g, ääll-›äl
    čäällim+N+Sg+Nom: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Gen: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Acc: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Ill: čäḷimân
    čäällim+N+Sg+Loc: čäḷimist
    čäällim+N+Sg+Com: čäḷimáin
    čäällim+N+Sg+Abe: čäällimttáá
    čäällim+N+Ess: čäḷimin
    čäällim+N+Par: čäḷimid
    čäällim+N+Pl+Nom: čäḷimeh
    čäällim+N+Pl+Gen: čäḷimij
    čäällim+N+Pl+Acc: čäḷimijd
    čäällim+N+Pl+Ill: čäḷimáid
    čäällim+N+Pl+Loc: čälimijn
    čäällim+N+Pl+Com: čäḷimijguin
    čäällim+N+Pl+Abe: čäḷimijttáá


  Noun - myenster: # 1B
    myenster+N+Sg+Nom: myenster
    myenster+N+Sg+Gen: myenster
    myenster+N+Sg+Acc: myenster
    myenster+N+Sg+Ill: myenˊsterân
    myenster+N+Sg+Loc: myenˊsterist
    myenster+N+Sg+Com: myenˊsteráin
    myenster+N+Sg+Abe: myensterttáá
    myenster+N+Ess:    myenˊsterin
    myenster+N+Par:    myenˊsterid
    myenster+N+Pl+Nom: myenˊstereh
    myenster+N+Pl+Gen: myenˊsterij
    myenster+N+Pl+Acc: myenˊsterijd
    myenster+N+Pl+Ill: myenˊsteráid
    myenster+N+Pl+Loc: myenˊsterijn
    myenster+N+Pl+Com: myenˊsterijguin
    myenster+N+Pl+Abe: myenˊsterijttáá



  Noun - piäggálm: # 1B
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Nom: piäggálm
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Gen: piäggálm
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Acc: piäggálm
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Ill: piägálmân
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Loc: piägálmist
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Com: piägálmáin
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Abe: piäggálmttáá
    piäggálm+N+Ess:    piägálmin
    piäggálm+N+Par:    piägálmid
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Nom: piägálmeh
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Gen: piägálmij
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Acc: piägálmijd
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Ill: piägálmáid
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Loc: piägálmijn
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Com: piägálmijguin
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Abe: piägálmijttáá

  Noun - čuáđáád: #
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Nom: čuáđáád
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Gen: čuáđáád
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Acc: čuáđáád
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Ill: čuáˊđádân
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Loc: čuáˊđádist
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Com: čuáˊđádáin
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Abe: čuáđáádttáá
    čuáđáád+N+Ess: čuáˊđádin
    čuáđáád+N+Par: čuáˊđádid
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Nom: čuá'đádeh
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Gen: čuá'đádij
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Acc: čuáˊđádijd
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Ill: čuáˊđádáid
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Loc: čuáˊđádijn
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Com: čuáˊđádijguin
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Abe: čuáˊđádijttáá



  Noun - viettâr: # 1B - ok
    viettâr+N+Sg+Nom: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Gen: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Acc: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Ill: vieˊtârân
    viettâr+N+Sg+Loc: vieˊtârist
    viettâr+N+Sg+Com: vieˊtâráin
    viettâr+N+Sg+Abe: viettârttáá
    viettâr+N+Ess: vieˊtârin 
    viettâr+N+Par: vieˊtârid 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Nom: vieˊtâreh
    viettâr+N+Pl+Gen: vieˊtârij
    viettâr+N+Pl+Acc: vieˊtârijd 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Ill: vieˊtâráid 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Loc: vieˊtârijn 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Com: vieˊtârijguin
    viettâr+N+Pl+Abe: vieˊtârijttáá


  Noun - iäˊláán: # 1B
    iäláán+N+Sg+Nom: iäˊláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Gen: iäˊláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Acc: iäˊláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Ill: iäˊlánân
    iäláán+N+Sg+Loc: iäˊlánist
    iäláán+N+Sg+Com: iäˊlánáin
    iäláán+N+Sg+Abe: iäˊláánttáá
    iäláán+N+Ess:    iäˊlánin
    iäláán+N+Par:    iäˊlánid
    iäláán+N+Pl+Nom: iäˊláneh
    iäláán+N+Pl+Gen: iäˊlánij
    iäláán+N+Pl+Acc: iäˊlánijd
    iäláán+N+Pl+Ill: iäˊlánid
    iäláán+N+Pl+Loc: iäˊlánjin
    iäláán+N+Pl+Com: iäˊlánijguin
    iäláán+N+Pl+Abe: iäˊlánijttáá


  Noun - čohhoom: # 1B g-v, hhoo-›ho
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Nom: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Gen: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Acc: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Ill: čoḥomân
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Loc: čoḥomist
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Com: čoḥomáin
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Abe: čohhoomttáá
    čohhoom+N+Ess: čoḥomin
    čohhoom+N+Par: čoḥomid
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Nom: čoḥomeh
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Gen: čoḥomij
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Acc: čoḥomijd
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Ill: čoḥomáid
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Loc: čoḥomijn
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Com: čoḥomijguin
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Abe: čoḥomijttáá


  Noun - immeel: # 1B g-v, CCVV > CV
    immeel+N+Sg+Nom: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Gen: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Acc: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Ill: iṃelân
    immeel+N+Sg+Loc: iṃelist
    immeel+N+Sg+Com: iṃeláin
    immeel+N+Sg+Abe: immeelttáá
    immeel+N+Ess: iṃelin
    immeel+N+Par: iṃelid
    immeel+N+Pl+Nom: iṃeleh
    immeel+N+Pl+Gen: iṃelij
    immeel+N+Pl+Acc: iṃelijd
    immeel+N+Pl+Ill: iṃeláid
    immeel+N+Pl+Loc: iṃelijn
    immeel+N+Pl+Com: iṃelijguin
    immeel+N+Pl+Abe: iṃelijttáá


  Noun - čiermih: # 1B d-kk,  rm-ˊrm
    čiermih+N+Sg+Nom: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Gen: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Acc: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Ill: čieˊrmihân
    čiermih+N+Sg+Loc: čieˊrmihist
    čiermih+N+Sg+Com: čieˊrmiháin
    čiermih+N+Sg+Abe: čiermihttáá
    čiermih+N+Ess: čieˊrmihin
    čiermih+N+Par: čieˊrmihid
    čiermih+N+Pl+Nom: čieˊrmiheh
    čiermih+N+Pl+Gen: čieˊrmihij
    čiermih+N+Pl+Acc: čieˊrmihijd
    čiermih+N+Pl+Ill: čieˊrmiháid
    čiermih+N+Pl+Loc: čieˊrmihijn
    čiermih+N+Pl+Com: čieˊrmihijguin
    čiermih+N+Pl+Abe: čieˊrmihijttáá



  Noun - eemeed: # 1B v-k-v, VVCVV > VCV
    eemeed+N+Sg+Nom: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Gen: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Acc: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Ill: emedân
    eemeed+N+Sg+Loc: emedist
    eemeed+N+Sg+Com: emedáin
    eemeed+N+Sg+Abe: eemeedttáá
    eemeed+N+Ess: emedin
    eemeed+N+Par: emedid
    eemeed+N+Pl+Nom: emedeh
    eemeed+N+Pl+Gen: emedij
    eemeed+N+Pl+Acc: emedijd
    eemeed+N+Pl+Ill: emedáid
    eemeed+N+Pl+Loc: emedijn
    eemeed+N+Pl+Com: emedijguin
    eemeed+N+Pl+Abe: emedijttáá


  Noun - kaavpug: #
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Nom: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Gen: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Acc: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Ill: [kaavpugân, ka'vpugân]
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Loc: [kavpugist, kaˊvpugist]
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Com: [kavpugáin, kaˊvpugáin]
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Abe: kaavpugttáá
    kaavpug+N+Ess: kaˊvpugin
    kaavpug+N+Par: kaˊvpugid
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Nom: [kavpugeh, kaˊvpugeh]
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Gen: [kavpugij, kaˊvpugij]
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Acc: [kavpugijd, kaˊvpugijd]
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Ill: [kavpugáid, kaˊvpugáid]
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Loc: [kavpugijn, kaˊvpugijn]
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Com: kaˊvpugijguin
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Abe: kaˊvpugijttáá



  Noun - vinnjooh: # 1B - ok
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Nom: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Gen: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Acc: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Ill: viˊnjohân
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Loc: viˊnjohist
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Com: viˊnjoháin
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Abe: vinnjoohttáá
    vinnjooh+N+Ess:    viˊnjohin
    vinnjooh+N+Par:    viˊnjohid
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Nom: viˊnjoheh
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Gen: viˊnjohij
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Acc: viˊnjohijd
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Ill: viˊnjoháid
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Loc: viˊnjohijn
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Com: viˊnjohijguin
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Abe: viˊnjohijttáá
